Washington statutes.
RCW 36.79.010

Definitions.

The definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Rural arterial program" means improvement projects on those county roads in rural areas classified as rural arterials and collectors in accordance with the federal functional classification system and the construction of replacement bridges funded by the federal bridge replacement program on access roads in rural areas.

(2) "Rural area" means every area of the state outside of areas designated as urban areas by the state transportation commission with the approval of the secretary of the United States department of transportation in accordance with federal law.

(3) "Board" means the county road administration board created by RCW 36.78.030.

[ 1997 c 81 s 1; 1988 c 26 s 1; 1983 1st ex.s. c 49 s 1.]